Utah statutes.
15-9-103.   Administration -- Rulemaking -- Service of process -- Athlete
Agents Licensing Board.
(1) (a)  This chapter shall be administered by the Division of Occupational
and Professional Licensing and is subject to the requirements of Title 58,
Chapter 1, Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing Act, so long as
the requirements of Title 58, Chapter 1, are not inconsistent with the
requirements of this chapter.
(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the division may make rules necessary to implement the provisions of this
chapter.
(2)  By acting as an athlete agent in this state, a nonresident individual
appoints the director of the division as the individual's agent for service of
process in any civil action in this state related to the individual's acting
as an athlete agent in this state.
(3) (a)  There is created the Athlete Agents Licensing Board consisting of
four athlete agents and one member of the general public.
(b)  The Athlete Agents Licensing Board shall be appointed and serve in
accordance with Section 58-1-201.
(c)  The duties and responsibilities of the Athlete Agents Licensing Board are
in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.
(d)  In addition, the Athlete Agents Licensing Board shall designate one of
its members on a permanent or rotating basis to:
(i)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or
unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and
(ii)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.
(e)  A member of the Athlete Agents Licensing Board who has, under Subsection
(3)(d), reviewed a complaint or advised in its investigation may be
disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a
presiding officer in an adjudicative proceeding concerning the complaint.
